California statutes. Water Code
A certified copy of the entry in the minutes of the board excluding any land shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48082.

Notwithstanding the exclusion of land, the district remains a district as fully to every intent and purpose as it would be had no change been made in its boundaries, or had the land excluded therefrom never constituted a portion of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48083.

In case land is excluded from any district, the board may, not less than 60 days before any election in the district, re-establish the boundaries of the divisions within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48084.

Nothing in this division shall operate to release any of the land excluded from the district from any obligation to pay, or any lien thereon of any valid outstanding bonds or other indebtedness of the district at the time of the filing of the petition for the exclusion of the land. The excluded land shall be subject to any lien, and answerable and chargeable for and with the payment and discharge of all outstanding obligations of the district at the time of the filing of the petition for the exclusion, as fully as though the petition for such exclusion were never filed and the order of exclusion never made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48085.

All provisions which might be resorted to to compel the payment by the land of its quota or portion of outstanding district obligations, had the exclusion never been accomplished, may, notwithstanding the exclusion, be resorted to to compel and enforce the payment on the part of the land of its quota and portion of outstanding district obligations for which it is liable as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48086.

The land excluded shall not be held answerable or chargeable for any obligation incurred after the exclusion of the land from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48087.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any outstanding bonds, the holders of which have assented to the exclusion of the land from the district, as provided in Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion [48200. - 48260.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Notice [48200. - 48205.]

48200.

The holders of title representing one-half or more of any body of land within the same watershed as an existing district may file with the board a written petition praying that the boundaries of the district may be so changed as to include their land. The land need not be contiguous to the existing boundaries of the district and need not consist of contiguous parcels. A copy of the petiton shall be filed with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48201.

The petition shall describe the boundaries of the parcel or tract of land and the boundaries of the several parcels owned by the petitioners, if the petitioners are the owners, respectively, of distinct parcels. The descriptions need not be more particular than they are required to be when such land is entered by the county assessor in the assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48202.

The petition shall be acknowledged, and shall contain the assent of the petitioners to the inclusion within the district of the land described in the petition and of which the petition alleges they are the owners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48203.

The board shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition to be published in the same manner and for the same time that notices of special elections for the issue of bonds are required by this division to be published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.

The notice shall state all the following:

(a) The filing of the petition and the names of the petitioners.

(b) A description of the land mentioned in the petition.

(c) The prayer of the petition.

(d) That all interested persons may appear at the time stated in the notice at the office of the board and show cause in writing why the change of the boundaries of the district, as proposed in the petition, should not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48205.

The petitioners shall advance to the board sufficient money to pay the estimated costs of all proceedings upon the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Order [48225. - 48231.]

48225.

At the time and place mentioned in the notice of filing of the inclusion petition, or at such other time or times to which the hearing of the inclusion petition may be adjourned, the board shall proceed to hear the petition and all the objections thereto presented in writing by any person showing cause why the proposed change of the boundaries of the district should not be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48226.

The failure of any interested person to show cause in writing as provided in this article shall be an assent on his part to a change of the boundaries of the district as prayed for in the petition, or to any such change thereof as will include a part of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48227.

The board shall order the boundaries of the district changed so as to include the land described in the inclusion petition, or such portion thereof as the board has found it feasible to serve by the system of works of the district and for the best interests of the district to include, only if:

(a) No protest against such change is made to the board in writing by the board, or a protest has been made and withdrawn.

(b) No protest against such change is made by holders of title to land pursuant to Section 48250, or such protest has been made and enough signatures withdrawn to render it insufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

48228.

The order of the board shall describe the boundaries as changed, and shall also describe the entire boundaries of the district as they will be after the change is made; and for that purpose the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of the boundaries as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48229.

A certified copy of the inclusion order shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which land to be included is situated. Thereupon the land becomes a part of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48230.

If the board determines that it is not feasible and practicable to serve any of the land described in the petition or that it is not for the best interest of the district that any of the land be included, it shall make an order denying the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

48231.

No inclusion of land into any district impairs its existence, its rights, including those in or to property, or its obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inclusion Elections [48250. - 48260.]

48250.

If upon the inclusion hearing the board concludes that it is feasible to serve the land, or a portion thereof, described in the inclusion petition, and that it is for the best interest of the district to include the land, or a portion thereof, within the district, it shall make a finding in writing describing the boundaries of the land which it proposes to include, if a protest signed by not less than 3 percent of the holders of title to not less than 3 percent in value of the land within the district according to the last equalized county tax assessment roll has been presented to the board, and after deducting all withdrawals is still signed by 3 percent of the holders of title to land within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 755.)
-------------------------------------------

48251.

Upon the making of a finding by the board as provided in Section 48250, it shall order that an inclusion election be held within the district to determine whether the boundaries of the district shall be changed to include the land specified in the finding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48252.

The board shall fix the time at which the election shall be held and cause notice thereof to be published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48253.

The notice shall be published and the election shall be held and conducted, returns thereof shall be made and canvassed, and the result of the election ascertained and declared, and all things pertaining thereto conducted in the manner prescribed by this division in the case of a special election to determine whether bonds of a district shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48254.

The notice of election shall state that the election is for the purpose of determining whether certain land, describing its boundaries, shall or shall not be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48255.

To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 60.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48256.

If at the election a majority of all the votes cast are against the change of the boundaries of the district, the petition is denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48257.

If a majority of the votes are in favor of the change of boundaries, the board shall make its order, as provided in Article 2 of this chapter, that the boundaries of the district are changed so as to include the land therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

48258.

A certified copy of the inclusion order shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county wherein land to be included is situated. Thereupon the land becomes a part of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48259.

In case land is included within any district as provided in this chapter, the board shall re-establish the boundaries of the divisions within the district so as to include the land therein, and so as to segregate into separate divisions land possessing the same general character of water rights or interests in and to the waters of the common source of supply of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

48260.

The board shall also re-establish the boundaries of the election precincts within the district, except that in the case of the inclusion of any land within less than 30 days before an election within the district, the election precincts shall not be re-established until after the election, and the holders of title to the newly included land shall not be entitled to vote at such election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Notification of Secretary of State of Exclusion or Inclusion [48300. - 48300.]

48300.

Whenever land is excluded from the district or land is included in the district pursuant to this part, the board shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The effective date of the exclusion or inclusion.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the excluded or included land, or reference to a map showing the boundaries of such excluded or included land, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If any order adopted by the board pursuant to this part with respect to the exclusion or inclusion of land contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Consolidation [48350. - 48350.]

48350.

A district may be consolidated in the same manner as is provided for the consolidation of county water districts in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Part 8 of Division 12.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 48300 (as added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 163) by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2132.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Dissolution [48400. - 48401.]

48400.

Any district organized pursuant to this division may be dissolved as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

48401.

In case a contract authorized by law has been made between a district and the United States pertaining to the construction, maintenance, or operation of the works of the district, or the delivery or supply of water therefor, no such district shall be dissolved nor shall any proceedings be initiated by a court or otherwise for the purpose of dissolving such district, unless and until the consent in writing of the Secretary of the Interior to such dissolution or proceedings has first been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. RECLAMATION DISTRICTS [50000. - 53901.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [50000. - 50170.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [50000. - 50016.]

50000.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50001.

“District” means any reclamation district formed pursuant to any law of this State prior to April 5, 1911, and any district formed pursuant to Article 2, Chapter 1, Title 8, Part 3 of the Political Code or pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50002.

“Board” means the board of trustees of a reclamation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50003.

“President” means the president of the board of trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50004.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the board of trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50005.

“Trustee” means a member of the board of trustees of a reclamation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50006.

“Landowner” means the holder of title or evidence of title to land within a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50007.

“Parcel” means a tract of land within a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50008.

“District lands” means all lands within a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50009.

“Principal county” means the county in which the whole or the greater portion of the land of a district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50010.

“County treasurer” means the county treasurer of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50011.

“Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50012.

“County clerk” means the county clerk of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50013.

“Reclamation works” means such public works and equipment as are necessary for the unwatering, watering, or irrigation of district lands and other district operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50014.

“Eligible person” means a landowner or the legal representative of a landowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------

50015.

“Legal representative” means an officer or other person or persons appointed to serve in that capacity by a landowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50016.

“Voter” means a landowner or the legal representative of a landowner, or if the district uses the alternate tax procedure under Article 4 (commencing with Section 51360) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of this division for the levying of a special tax on all taxable land and improvements, then “voter” means the owner of taxable land or land and improvements as shown on the last equalized tax roll of any county in which the lands of the district are situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 135.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [50100. - 50170.]



  ARTICLE 1. Applicability of Division [50100. - 50101.]

50100.

Nothing in this division impairs the validity of any district formed prior to the effective date of this division, its rights, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50101.

All swamp and overflowed salt-marsh and tidelands within one mile of the State Prison at San Quentin are excluded from the operation of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Districts Within Cities [50110. - 50111.]

50110.

Districts may be formed pursuant to this division for the reclamation of any land within any city, which land is subject in any manner, to overflow or incursions from the tide or inland waters of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50111.

When districts are formed in cities pursuant to Section 50110 the duties required by this division to be performed by county officers shall be performed by the officers of the city who usually perform like duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Public Lands [50120. - 50130.]

50120.

The purchaser of public land unsold in any district at the date of filing of the by-laws of the district takes the land subject to the provisions of the by-laws, and the charges assessed in pursuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50121.

A purchaser of public lands within a district has all the rights and privileges enjoyed by the original signers of the by-laws of the district upon payment of all charges assessed against the land for the cost and expense of reclamation, with interest from the date such charges became due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1745.)
-------------------------------------------

50123.

When the board, or landowners in districts having no board, certify under oath to the board of supervisors and show to its satisfaction that the reclamation works are completed, or that two dollars ($2) per acre has been expended for reclamation works on swamp or overflowed lands purchased pursuant to an application filed with the State Lands Commission prior to September 19, 1939, the board of supervisors shall certify such facts to the State Lands Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1745.)
-------------------------------------------

50124.

The State Lands Commission, upon receipt of the certification from the board of supervisors, shall forward to the treasurer of each county in which any part of the district is situated a statement showing the amount paid by each purchaser, including interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1745.)
-------------------------------------------

50126.

The county treasurer, upon receipt of the statement from the State Lands Commission showing the amounts paid by each purchaser of swamp and overflowed lands in the district, shall, after deducting all amounts chargeable against the lands in the district by reason of moneys drawn from the “swamp-land fund” of the county, pay the balance thereof pro rata to the original purchasers of land in the district, or their heirs, executors, administrators, successors or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1745.)
-------------------------------------------

50127.

No distribution of the “swamp-land fund” shall be made pursuant to Section 50126 while the district has an outstanding indebtedness represented by Controller’s warrants drawn on the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50128.

When the purchasers of swamp and overflowed lands have paid for such lands in full, the board may allow a credit of one dollar ($1) per acre on any unpaid or future assessment levied for reclamation purposes on all other lands in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1745.)
-------------------------------------------

50129.

No credit shall be given, or agreed to be given, until the landowner has paid all assessments levied on the lands, with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per year from date of delinguency, and all judgments therefor in full, less the amount of such credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50130.

No credit shall be given, or agreed to be given to any landowner who has previously received such credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Damage to Reclamation Works [50140. - 50142.]

50140.

Any person who cuts, injures, or destroys reclamation works in any district, is responsible for all damages occasioned thereby to such works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50141.

An action for damages caused by cutting, injuring, or destroying reclamation works may be commenced in the superior court of any county in which the works are situated, in the names of the trustees of the district. If there is no board, the action may be brought in the name of any landowner in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.

Damages recovered in the action shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the action is brought, who shall credit the amount to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Claims [50145. - 50145.]

50145.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Actions Against Districts [50151. - 50154.]

50151.

An action against any person by reason of his official connection with a district, or against the board, or the district, shall be instituted and tried in the proper court in the principal county. No court in any other county shall have jurisdiction over such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50153.

Any landowner may maintain an action on behalf of his district in the superior court of the county in which any part of the district is situated against a member of the board and his sureties upon his bond for any improper disbursement from the revolving fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50154.

Any landowner may maintain an action on behalf of his district in the superior court of a county in which any part of the district is situated against a member of the board for an improper disbursement of any district funds made with the member’s consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Evidence of Value and Ownership [50160. - 50160.]

50160.

For all purposes relating to signing petitions and bylaws and voting, the last equalized tax roll for each county wherein any district land is situated is sufficient evidence of ownership and of value of lands in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1763.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Landowners’ Representatives [50170. - 50170.]

50170.

Guardians, conservators, executors, administrators and other persons holding land in a trust capacity under appointment of court may sign petitions or bylaws or vote without obtaining special authority therefor. Corporation landowners may sign petitions or bylaws or vote by action of their legal representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [50300. - 50442.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition [50300. - 50335.]



  ARTICLE 1. Form and Publication [50300. - 50303.]

50300.

A petition for the formation of a district, verified by the affidavit of one of the petitioners, may be presented to the board of supervisors at a regular meeting thereof by:

(a) The owners of one-half or more of any body of swamp and overflowed, salt-marsh, or tidelands, or other lands subject to flood or overflow, susceptible of one mode of reclamation who desire to reclaim the land.

(b) The owners of one-half or more of any body of swamp and overflowed, salt-marsh, or tidelands susceptible of one mode of reclamation, and already reclaimed, or in progress of reclamation, and not included in any district, who desire to form a district for the maintenance, protection, or repair of the reclamation works, in, upon, or appertaining to such body of lands, or for the completion of the reclamation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50301.

The petition shall state that petitioners desire to reclaim the land, or that the land has been reclaimed, or that the reclamation is in progress, and shall contain:

(a) A description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district.

(b) A statement as to the total number of acres situated within the exterior boundaries.

(c) The name of each owner of record of real property situated within the exterior boundaries.

(d) The name of each county within which the proposed district lies, and if in more than one county, the number of acres of the district in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50302.

The petition shall be published once a week for two weeks preceding the hearing thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county with a notice of the time when the petition will be presented to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50303.

An affidavit of publication shall be filed with the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval [50310. - 50318.]

50310.

If the board of supervisors finds, on the hearing of the petition, that the statements therein are correct, it shall make an order approving the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50311.

If it is shown that any land is improperly included in the proposed district, the board of supervisors shall, in its order, exclude the same therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50312.

If the board of supervisors concludes that lands susceptible of the same mode of reclamation are improperly omitted from the proposed district, and the owners thereof have not appeared at the hearing, it shall continue the hearing on the petition, and direct that notice be given to the nonappearing landowners to appear before the board of supervisors, and show cause, why their lands should not be included in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50313.

The notice to nonappearing landowners shall be given either by publication in the same manner and for the same period as the orginal petition, or by personal service on each such landowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50314.

If the notice is given by personal service, the service shall be made at least three days prior to the date fixed for the further hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50315.

Proof of publication or personal service of the notice shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors on or before the day to which the hearing is continued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50316.

The board of supervisors may further continue the hearing from time to time, by order entered upon its minutes, to the end that a full hearing may be had.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50317.

Upon the final hearing on the petition the board of supervisors shall make an order approving the petition, as originally presented, or in a modified form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50318.

The order, signed by the chairman of the board of supervisors, and attested by the clerk thereof, shall describe the exterior boundaries of the district, as determined by the board of supervisors, and shall be indorsed upon or attached to the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Filing and Recording [50330. - 50335.]

50330.

The petition, with the order of the board of supervisors endorsed thereon or attached thereto, shall be recorded by the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

50331.

When a district is situated partly in different counties, the board, after the petition has been granted, shall forward a copy of the petition and the order approving the same to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each of the counties in which any portion of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50332.

A copy of the petition and order of the board of supervisors approving the same, certified by the county clerk, shall be forwarded to the State Lands Commission which shall thereupon forward to the county treasurer a statement showing the names of purchasers of public land in the district who have paid in full therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50333.

The State Lands Commission, upon the receipt of a copy of a petition, or certificate of the county clerk that a district has been formed, shall number the district and send a notice containing the number so assigned to the county recorder of the county from which the copy or certificate came.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

50334.

The county recorder, upon receipt of the notice from the State Lands Commission, shall record the same, and the district shall thereafter be known and designated by the number shown in said notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

50335.

Districts organized before May 28, 1868, may retain their respective numbers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Organization [50370. - 50374.]

50370.

The owners of a majority of the acreage in the district may adopt bylaws, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for the government and control of the affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50370.2.

As an alternative to the adoption of bylaws by the owners, the board may adopt bylaws, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for the government and control of the district, after notice of a public hearing and the holding of a public hearing on the bylaws proposed to be so adopted. Adoption shall be by a resolution adopted after the close of the public hearing on the bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50370.4.

The notice of public hearing shall be posted in at least three conspicuous places within the district for at least 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing, and shall state the date, time, and place of the public hearing. The notice shall contain a statement that copies of the proposed bylaws will be available to the public at a location and at times which shall be set forth in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50370.6.

At the public hearing held on the bylaws proposed to be so adopted, the board shall receive any comments or proposals concerning the proposed bylaws, and may adopt or reject such comments or proposals, or may continue the hearing from time to time, not to exceed 30 days from the date specified in the notice of hearing. The board may further continue the hearing, from time to time, but each continuance shall be for not more than 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50371.

When the bylaws have been adopted they shall be filed for record with the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50373.

By-laws may be amended in the same manner as adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50374.

A board of trustees shall be elected as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 50600) of Part 3 of this division unless the district is formed to operate without trustees pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50400) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Districts Formed to Operate Without a Board [50400. - 50403.]

50400.

When any land, susceptible of one mode of reclamation, is entirely owned by parties who desire to reclaim the land, and to manage the reclamation without a board or the establishment of by-laws, they may file the petition provided for in Chapter 1 of this part, and state therein that they intend to undertake the reclamation on their own responsibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50401.

When the petition is granted, the district is organized and the owners of the lands have all the rights, immunities, privileges, and duties granted to boards and in all proceedings the names of the owners shall be used instead of the names of trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50402.

The existence of a district formed to operate without a board shall not prevent the owners of the land included therein from forming a district to operate with a board by presenting to the board of supervisors the petition provided for in Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50403.

The presentation of a petition for formation of a district to operate with a board is an abandonment of the rights, immunities, and privileges conferred upon the owners or their predecessors in interest in the land by the creation of the original district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Validating Proceedings [50440. - 50442.]

50440.

An action to determine the legality of the existence of a district may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1532.)
-------------------------------------------

50441.

The court shall not adjudge any district invalid when it appears that the district has for five years prior to the commencement of the proceeding been prosecuting or maintaining reclamation works in good faith.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1532.)
-------------------------------------------

50442.

No proceeding in quo warranto, nor any similar action or proceeding shall be maintained in the name of the people of the State against any district that, continuously for five years next preceding the commencement of the proceeding, has been acting as a district and prosecuting or maintaining its works of reclamation in good faith.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1532.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. BOARD OF TRUSTEES [50600. - 50660.]



  CHAPTER 1. Selection, Tenure and Compensation [50600. - 50610.]

50600.

After the formation of the district, the board of supervisors, on the application of a landowner, shall call an election in compliance with the provisions of Part 4 (commencing with Section 50700) of this division at which election there shall be elected three eligible persons, who shall constitute, when elected and qualified the first board of trustees of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

50601.

The by-laws of a district may provide, or be amended to provide, for a board of five or seven members, and, if the original by-laws so provide, five or seven eligible persons respectively shall be elected as trustees at each election, or, if the by-laws are amended, then five or seven eligible persons shall be elected at the next district election held subsequent to the date of amendment, and at each election held thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

50602.

Members of the board shall be elected for a term of four years and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. The terms of the members shall be staggered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

50602.5.
